Hawaii statutes.
§806-51 Plea of autrefois convict or
acquit. In any plea of autrefois convict or autrefois acquit, it shall be
sufficient for the defendant to state that the defendant has been lawfully
convicted or acquitted (as the case may be) of the offense charged in the
indictment. [L 1876, c 40, §40; RL 1925, §4072; RL 1935, §5521; RL 1945,
§10824; RL 1955, §258-34; HRS §711-51; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Pleadings and motions before trial, see HRPP rule 12(a).

Case Notes

Where accused by accused's own action has obtained reversal
of whole judgment, new trial may be had against accused as if no trial had
previously taken place. 25 H. 581 (1920).

Cited: 27 H. 270, 271 (1923).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next